Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1090.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 6-403, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE6-403. Prohibitions Except as authorized under this title: 1. No person or group of persons shall transact business within the scope of this chapter, or do any business under any name or title, or circulate or use any advertising, or make any representation or give any information to any person, which that indicates or reasonably implies the operation of a business which that is within the scope of this chapter. 2. No foreign savings and loan association or savings bank shall be admitted or allowed to maintain an office in this state to transact the business of a savings and loan association or savings bank. END_STATUTE